Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2599.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-1121, to read: START_STATUTE38-1121. Law enforcement officers; military protective orders; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, If a law enforcement officer in this state determines that A Military Protective Order entered into the National Crime Information Center has been issued against a member of the armed forces of the united states and the member violates the Military protective order in this state, the law enforcement officer shall notify the agency that entered the Military Protective Order into the NATIONAL CRIME INFORMATION CENTER that the law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe the member has violated the Military Protective Order. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Military protective order" means a protection order issued pursuant to 10 United States Code Section 1567 by a commanding officer of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of any state against a person under the commanding officer's command. 2. "National crime information center" means A criminal records database to which criminal justice agencies may do all of the following: (a) Enter or search for information about stolen property, missing or wanted persons and domestic violence protection orders. (b) Obtain Criminal histories. (c) Access the National Sex Offender Registry. END_STATUTE